California statutes. Insurance Code
(3) The commissioner finds that the exposure to potential losses will threaten the solvency of the associate participating insurer or place the associate participating insurer in a hazardous condition. “Hazardous condition” has the same meaning as in Section 1065.1 and includes, but is not limited to, a condition in which an associate participating insurer makes claims payments for losses resulting from an earthquake that occurred within the preceding two years and that required a reduction in policyholder surplus of at least 25 percent for payment of those claims.

(4) There is cancellation under Section 676.

(5) The associate participating insurer has lost or experienced a substantial reduction in the availability or scope of reinsurance coverage or a substantial increase in the premium charged for reinsurance coverage for its residential property insurance policies, and the commissioner has approved a plan for the nonrenewals that is fair and equitable, and that is responsive to the changes in the associate participating insurer’s reinsurance position.

(6) The named insured is insured based upon membership in a motor club, as defined in Section 12142, and the membership in that organization is terminated as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1861.03.

(h) For associate participating insurers, underwriting standards applicable to residential property insurance shall not be applied in an unfairly discriminatory fashion against any person who accepts or elects to continue earthquake coverage.

(i) Associate participating insurers shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1) Associate participating insurers shall conform to all provisions of the authority’s plan of operation applicable to participating insurers.

(2) No property that has previously been covered by a policy of residential earthquake insurance written by the associate participating insurer or associate participating insurer group, absent at least one full policy year with an insurer not affiliated with the associate participating insurer or its group, may be placed into the authority by an associate participating insurer.

(3) Any associate participating insurer or associate participating insurer group defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) that has failed to maintain or exceed the number of policies of residential property insurance in force on January 1, 1996, may become an associate participating insurer by contributing additional capital into the authority at a rate to be established by the board, which shall be a per policy rate comparable to the average cost per policy paid by a participating insurer that joins the authority pursuant to Section 10089.15.

(j) Any associate participating insurer shall be required to establish procedures to verify compliance with this section. The procedures shall require verification that each basic residential earthquake policy written by the authority complies with paragraph (2) of subdivision (i).

(k) Any violation of this section may be enforced as a violation of the Unfair Trade Practices Act (Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1). Each policy of basic residential earthquake insurance written in the authority by an associate participating insurer in violation of this section shall be deemed to be a separate violation of the Unfair Trade Practices Act.

(l) For purposes of this section, no insurer or associate participating insurer may participate in the authority unless all affiliated insurers participate in the authority.

(m) Policies of basic residential earthquake insurance written by associate participating insurers shall be subject to assessment by the California Insurance Guarantee Association and shall be covered to the extent provided in Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. Except as provided in Section 10089.34, insurance policies written by participating insurers that are not associate participating insurers shall not be subject to assessment by the California Insurance Guarantee Association if the assessment is imposed to pay claims covered by policies of basic residential earthquake insurance written by an associate participating insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 303, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by second Sec. 8 of Ch. 303.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.17.

Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 10089.7, the authority shall be subject to the provisions of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 11.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.19.

(a) Participating insurers that want to withdraw from the authority may do so on 12 months’ written notice to the authority. Insurers that withdraw shall not be entitled to any refund, reimbursement, or reduction of any initial capital contribution obligation or earthquake loss assessments previously paid or accrued with respect to losses incurred prior to the withdrawal. Insurers that withdraw shall offer residential earthquake insurance coverage pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10081) to those policyholders for whom they write the underlying residential property insurance upon the first renewal following the insurer’s notice to the authority. The authority shall nonrenew all policies of basic residential earthquake insurance issued to policyholders whose provider of
 residential earthquake insurance has withdrawn from the authority. No participating insurer may withdraw unless every insurer affiliated with that insurer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1215, or under common control with that insurer, defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1215, simultaneously withdraws from the authority.

(b) If a noticed withdrawal would result in participation by insurers whose cumulative residential property insurance market share is less than 65 percent of the total residential property insurance market in California, the commissioner shall make recommendations to the Legislature for the continuation or termination of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 25.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.20.

The authority shall renew any policy of basic residential earthquake insurance, provided the authority receives payment of the applicable renewal premium on or before the expiration date stated in the policy. The authority shall nonrenew, rescind, or cancel a policy if the property is no longer covered by an underlying policy of residential property insurance. The policy issued by the authority shall not provide coverage in the event that there is no underlying policy of property insurance at the time of loss. In that case, any unearned premiums shall be returned to the policyholder on a pro rata basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 12.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.21.

The authority is a public instrumentality of the State of California and the exercise of its powers is an essential state governmental function. No provision of law, including, but not limited to, subdivision (h) of Section 10089.7 and subdivision (e) of Section 10089.22, shall be construed to affect the status of the authority as a public instrumentality of the State of California. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority is not and shall never be authorized to become a debtor in a case under the United States Bankruptcy Code (Title 11 of the United States Code) or to make an assignment for the benefit of creditors or to become the subject of any similar case or proceeding, nor is the authority subject to Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) and Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner shall not, directly or indirectly, when exercising the power and authority contained or referred to in or arising from Section 10089.6, paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 10089.7, Section 10089.12, subdivision (e) of Section 10089.22, subdivision (b) of Section 10089.35, or any other statute, rule, or regulation, impede or in any manner interfere with, but shall affirmatively take all necessary steps to effect, and no person acting under subdivision (c) of Section 10089.11, or any other provision of law or principle of equity shall be permitted in any way to impede or in any manner interfere with: (a) the full and timely payment of principal, interest, and premiums on revenue bonds of the authority and amounts due those bond insurers and providers of credit support and letters of credit; and (b) any pledge or assignment of revenues as security for those payments or amounts due, and the full and timely application of those pledged or assigned revenues to those payments and amounts due, in each or either case, (a) or (b), as and when due in accordance with and subject to the limitations contained in Section 10089.22 and the terms of the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of the bonds and the providers of bond insurance, credit support, and letters of credit.

Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code shall not apply to acts of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 13.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.22.

(a) The authority shall be continued in existence for so long as its bonds are outstanding. Unless and until the authority is terminated pursuant to Section 10089.43, the commissioner and the authority shall execute assignments and contracts and take all necessary steps to assure that all revenue of the authority is paid to a trustee appointed by the Treasurer, which trustee may be the treasurer. The revenue of the authority shall be pledged and assigned to and held in trust by the trustee and invested and disbursed by the trustee, to pay, or to set aside funds to pay, principal, interest, and premiums on bonds and amounts due bond insurers and providers of credit support and letters of credit for those bonds, but only in the manner and in accordance with the terms of the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of bonds of the authority and the providers of bond insurance, credit support and letters of credit for those bonds. Amounts held by the trustee from time to time after provisions for those payments may be disbursed free of trust to the California Earthquake Authority Fund. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, (1) debt service payments on bonds of the authority secured by or payable from securities described in Section 16430 of the Government Code shall not be secured by a pledge or assignment of revenue of the authority other than revenue of the authority from (A) the proceeds of sale of such bonds, (B) the securities described in Section 16430 of the Government Code, and (C) principal and interest payments on such securities described in Government Code Section 16430, but debt service payments on such bonds of the authority may also be made payable from revenue of the authority in the California Earthquake Authority Fund, and (2) the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of bonds of the authority referred to in paragraph (1) shall specify that payment of a portion of the interest on such bonds is contingent upon payment of policyholder claims for which the bonds are responsible and that the obligation of the authority is to first apply such assigned or pledged revenue to the payment of such policyholder claims instead of paying that contingent interest.

(b) There is hereby created the California Earthquake Authority Fund, which is not a fund in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for the purposes of this chapter. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner, subject to the direction of the board, to pay all costs arising from this chapter, including, but not limited to, premiums payable by the authority under contracts of reinsurance, claims arising under policies of basic residential earthquake insurance issued by the authority, operating and other expenses of the authority, and to establish reserves. At the discretion of the commissioner, segregated, dedicated accounts within the fund may be established for those payments.

(c) The board may cause moneys in the fund to be invested and reinvested, from time to time, in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 10089.7 and subject to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.6. Moneys in the fund and not so invested may be deposited from time to time in (1) financial institutions authorized by law to receive deposits of public moneys, or (2) with the approval of the Treasurer, the Surplus Money Investment Fund as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) A national bank shall be custodian of all securities belonging to the fund, except as otherwise provided in this chapter and except as otherwise provided in the constituent instruments that define the rights of the holders of bonds of the authority and the providers of bond insurance, credit support, and letters of credit for those bonds.

(e) The board may, in cooperation with the Treasurer, authorize the establishment of an account or fund in the State Treasury in the name of the authority, but money deposited with the Treasurer in that account or fund is not state money within the intent of Section 16305.2 of the Government Code, and Sections 16305.3 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code shall not apply to money drawn or collected by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 14.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.23.

(a) (1) If at any time following the payment of earthquake claims and claim expenses the authority’s available capital is reduced to less than three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), or if at any time the authority’s available capital is insufficient to pay benefits and continue operations, the authority shall have the power to assess participating insurance companies subject to the maximum limits as set forth in this section and Section 10089.30. The assessment shall be limited to the amount necessary to pay the outstanding or expected claims and claim expenses of the authority and to return the authority’s available capital to three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), as determined by the board, subject to approval by the commissioner.

(2) Each participating insurer’s assessment shall be determined by multiplying the percentage share of the authority’s total gross written premium that is attributable to that participating insurer’s sales of authority insurance policies, as of April 30 of the immediately preceding year or the most recent year for which premium data not more than one year old are available, by the amount of the total assessment sought by the authority.

(3) The maximum permissible insurer assessments pursuant to this section and Sections 10089.30 and 10089.31 shall be reduced uniformly by multiplication of the maximum assessments and other amounts provided in those sections by the percentage of the total residential property insurance market share participation attained by the authority. The total amount of all assessments levied on participating insurance companies by the authority pursuant to this
 section shall not exceed three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000), regardless of the frequency or severity of earthquake losses at any and all times subsequent to the creation of the authority. Once a participating insurer has paid, pursuant to this section, amounts equal to the percentage share of the authority’s total gross written premium attributable to that participating insurer’s sales of authority insurance policies, as of April 30 of the immediately preceding year or the most recent full year for which premium data not more than one year old are available, multiplied by three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) reduced as provided in this paragraph from the maximum assessment, the authority’s power to assess that insurer under this section shall cease and the authority shall be prohibited from levying additional assessments on that insurer pursuant to this section.

(4) Beginning December 31 of the first year of operations, and each December
 31 thereafter, the board shall adjust the maximum permissible insurer assessments pursuant to this section, the maximum permissible insurer assessments pursuant to Sections 10089.30 and 10089.31, the maximum permissible authority policyholder assessment pursuant to Section 10089.29, and the maximum permissible bond issuances or other debt financing issued or secured by the Treasurer pursuant to Section 10089.29 to reflect the market share of new insurers entering into the authority as authorized by Sections 10089.15 and 10089.16 and participating insurers withdrawing from the authority as authorized by Section 10089.19. The adjustments shall be made in the same manner as authorized by paragraph (3).

(b) In the case of any insurer assessment, the authority shall cause to be sent to each participating insurer a notice of that insurer’s assessment, and full payment shall be due within 30 days and shall be overdue after 30 days. Penalties and
 interest shall be assessed for late payments in the same manner as provided for late payments of the insurer gross premium tax pursuant to Section 12258 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The board may waive the penalties and interest for good cause shown. The board shall make every effort to assess insurers only for funds reasonably anticipated to be necessary for claims payments and claim expenses and to return the authority’s available capital to three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000).

(c) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the aggregate assessment the authority is authorized by this section to impose shall be reduced to zero on December 1, 2008, with respect to earthquake events that commence on or after December 1, 2008.

(d) The authority shall not assess a participating insurer under this section based on any insurance business that is
 attributable to the insurer selling the insurer’s insurance products that supplement or augment the basic residential earthquake insurance provided by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 178.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.24.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the maximum permissible assessment pursuant to Section 10089.23 of a participating insurer that began renewing business into the authority less than 12 months prior to the date of the assessment shall be based on the residential earthquake market share of business actually placed into the authority by the insurer as of the date of the assessment.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the maximum permissible assessments pursuant to Section 10089.23 that are permitted for all participating insurers not covered by subdivision (a) shall not be modified to reflect the addition of a new participating insurer until 12 months after that insurer has begun renewing business into the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 264, Sec. 4.   Effective August 6, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.25.

Beginning December 31, 1997, and annually thereafter on the 30th of April, the board shall notify each participating insurer of the maximum earthquake loss funding assessment level that it may be required to meet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 264, Sec. 5.   Effective August 6, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.26.

(a) The authority shall issue policies of basic residential earthquake insurance, including an option for earthquake loss assessment policies for individual condominium unit properties, to any owner of a qualifying residential property, as long as the owner has secured a policy of residential property insurance from a participating insurer.

(1) For purposes of this section, earthquake loss assessment coverage shall be issued in a minimum amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for individual condominium units valued at more than one hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($135,000). Earthquake loss assessment coverage shall be issued in a minimum amount of twenty-five thousand
 dollars ($25,000) for individual condominium units of one hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($135,000) in value or less. The value of the land shall be excluded when determining the value of the condominium, as it relates to the earthquake loss assessment coverage offered by the authority.

(2) The panel shall submit to the board, and the board shall approve, rates for earthquake loss assessment coverage that reasonably balance the earthquake loss assessment coverages offered and the potential exposure to earthquake loss resulting from an earthquake loss assessment policy as compared to the coverages offered and the potential exposure to earthquake loss resulting from residential property other than individual condominium policies.

It is the intent of the Legislature, to the extent practicable, that rates charged by the authority to condominium loss assessment policyholders and residential property
 owner policyholders are treated equitably, and that a proportionate share of premiums is paid for potential exposure to loss, to the authority.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a participating or nonparticipating insurer from offering a condominium earthquake loss assessment policy for different amounts of coverage other than those offered by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 419, Sec. 8.   (AB 2064)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.27.

(a) Every participating insurer that has in-force residential earthquake insurance policies in the state as of the date of commencement of authority operations shall renew each in-force residential earthquake insurance policy or earthquake coverage provided by endorsement into the authority at the time the policy or endorsement comes up for renewal. The effective date of each policy renewal into the authority shall be the renewal date of the policy as recorded in the records of the insurer and disclosed to the policyholder. The risk of loss under the insurance policy does not transfer to the authority until 12:01 a.m. of the policy renewal date.

(b) (1) All policies of residential earthquake insurance
 written by any participating insurer shall have been renewed into the authority within one year of the commencement of operations of the authority or the date an insurer elects to participate in the authority, whichever is later, and after that date, no participating insurer shall be permitted to write a policy of insurance that provides coverage within the terms and limits of a policy of basic residential earthquake insurance for any qualifying residential property in the state. Participating insurers may sell residential earthquake insurance products that supplement or augment the basic residential earthquake insurance provided by the authority.

(2) Upon application to the authority demonstrating good cause and approval of the commissioner, a participating insurer may take up to 60 days beyond that one-year period to complete its renewal of earthquake policies into the authority. No extension of time to complete earthquake policy renewals
 into the authority shall serve to extend the due date by which an insurer is to make its initial capital contribution, as set forth in Section 10089.15. The commissioner shall not approve any extension if the effect of the extension would allow an insurer to selectively transfer earthquake policies with high risks to the authority while retaining policies with lower risks during that interim period.

(3) After policies of residential earthquake insurance are renewed in the authority, insurers shall have no responsibilities or liabilities regarding those policies for losses incurred after the date of renewal of those policies, except for duties and responsibilities to the authority and policyholders under the terms of this chapter.

(4) No insurer may participate in the authority unless every insurer affiliated with that insurer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1215, or
 under common control with that insurer, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1215, also participates in the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 26.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.28.

(a) All policies of residential earthquake insurance provided by the authority shall be written by the authority. Authority policies shall be marketed and policyholders serviced by the participating insurer that writes the underlying policy of residential property insurance, and participating insurers shall be reasonably compensated for the claims and policyholder services they provide on behalf of the authority. Authority services may be performed on behalf of the authority in any reasonable manner by the participating insurer that is in compliance with statutory, regulatory, and case law regarding claims handling practices; provided, however, where the authority has promulgated specific procedures to govern its operations, the participating insurer shall conform
 its practices to those procedures. The authority procedures shall comply with statutory, regulatory, and case law governing claims handling practices. Nothing in this provision shall be deemed or construed to affect any duty or liability of the authority or participating carrier as set forth in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 10089.7.

(b) Concurrent with the issuance or renewal by the authority of a residential earthquake insurance policy, the following disclosure shall be provided to the insured in 14-point boldface type:

 

“California Earthquake Authority Policy Disclosure

You have purchased a California Earthquake Authority (CEA) earthquake insurance policy, which can help you cover the cost of repairing damage to your property and possessions caused by an earthquake.

The CEA is not part of your homeowners’ insurance company.

Please keep in mind these important things about your CEA insurance policy:

1. CEA policy coverages are different from the coverages provided in your homeowners’ insurance policy. For example, this policy does not cover earthquake damage to swimming pools, and it may provide more limited coverage for chimneys, outbuildings, and masonry fences. These are examples of possible differences between your CEA policy and your homeowners’ policy, and you should consult your CEA policy to understand the types of losses that are limited or excluded and those that are covered.

2. If CEA’s liability for earthquake losses exceeds the CEA’s available resources the CEA may reduce its payment to you or pay you in installments. This policy is not covered by the California Insurance Guarantee
 Association, and therefore, the California Insurance Guarantee Association will not pay your claims if the CEA becomes insolvent and is unable to make payments as promised.

3. In certain cases, your CEA policy premium may be subject to future surcharges if the CEA’s obligations to pay earthquake losses rise to a predefined level. In that case, in addition to your annual premium you may be charged up to an additional 20% of that premium.”

 

(c) The authority shall provide to participating insurers appropriate applications and forms and shall maintain records of all policies written, moneys received, and claims paid.

(d) The duty of an agent or broker to investigate the financial condition of the authority before placement of insurance shall be the same as the duty of an agent
 or broker to investigate the financial condition of an admitted insurer before placement of a policy of insurance.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 419, Sec. 10.   (AB 2064)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.29.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding the prior approval requirement of Section 10089.10, the authority shall issue and sell investment grade revenue bonds or secure other debt financing of the authority, or
 both, in amounts determined by the board pursuant to Section 10089.32, but not to exceed one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) plus costs of issuance and sale of those revenue bonds, costs of securing that debt financing, and amounts paid or payable to bond issuers and providers of credit
 support and letters of credit for, and interest on, those revenue bonds or other debt, if claims and claim expenses incurred by the authority from an earthquake event exhaust the total of the following:

(A) The authority’s available capital.

(B) The maximum amount of all contributions of initial operating capital made by participating insurers pursuant to Section 10089.15, and
 assessments levied and paid pursuant to Section 10089.23.

(C) All reinsurance actually available and under contract to the authority.

(D) All risk transfer provided and any other capital committed through capital market contracts that is actually under contract to the authority from private capital markets.

(2) The Treasurer shall act as agent for sale of the revenue bonds described in paragraph (1), and shall make available the net proceeds of those revenue bonds as funding for the authority. Failure of the authority to sell those revenue bonds or obtain that debt
 financing for any reason shall not obligate the State of California to provide or arrange replacement funding for the authority. The Treasurer may sell revenue bonds for the purpose of refunding the revenue bonds or other debt financing when authorized to do so by the board, and the surcharge authorized by this section may be used to repay that refunding, plus costs of issuance and sale of those revenue bonds or other debt financing being refunded, and amounts paid or payable to bond issuers and providers of credit support and letters of credit for, and interest on, those revenue bonds or other debt being refunded.

(b) (1) In the event of a revenue bond sale or debt financing arrangement pursuant to this section, the authority shall have the power
 to surcharge annually all authority policies to secure funds, which the authority
 may use solely to repay the bonded indebtedness or other debt, plus costs of issuance and sale of those revenue bonds or other debt, and amounts paid or payable to bond issuers and providers of credit support and letters of credit for, and interest on, those revenue bonds or other debt. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10089.23, the total net surcharge collected shall not exceed one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), plus costs of issuance and sale of those revenue bonds or other debt and amounts paid or payable to bond issuers and providers of credit support and letters of credit for, and interest on, those revenue bonds or other debt. The surcharge on an authority policy
 shall not exceed 20 percent of the annual
 authority residential earthquake insurance policy premium in any one year. A surcharge levied and collected pursuant to this section shall not be considered revenue, notwithstanding subdivision (o) of Section 10089.5, including for
 purposes of the calculation of rates filed with the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 10089.40. A surcharge levied and collected pursuant to this section also shall not be considered basic residential earthquake premium for any purpose, including the calculation of producer commission.

(2) If a policy issued by the authority includes a premium surcharge pursuant to this subdivision, the participating insurer shall provide the insured a notice in a stand-alone document stating that the policyholder may cancel or nonrenew the earthquake policy. The notice shall specify that cancellation or
 nonrenewal of the earthquake policy will not affect the underlying residential property insurance policy. The statement shall be provided with the premium billing and shall include the following statement in 14-point boldface type:

NOTICE OF SURCHARGE ON CEA EARTHQUAKE INSURANCE POLICY AND RIGHT TO CANCEL

THE CEA IS IMPOSING A SURCHARGE ON THE PREMIUM OF ALL CEA EARTHQUAKE INSURANCE POLICIES. You may choose to renew, to cancel, or not to renew (“nonrenew”) your CEA earthquake insurance policy. If you choose to cancel or nonrenew your CEA earthquake insurance policy, your CEA earthquake insurance policy will be canceled and that cancellation will have no effect on your policy of residential property insurance. If you fail to cancel or to nonrenew your CEA earthquake insurance policy, and if you
 also fail to pay the CEA earthquake insurance policy premium and surcharge by the payment deadline, both your CEA earthquake insurance policy and your policy of residential property insurance will be canceled. IF YOU WANT EARTHQUAKE INSURANCE PROVIDED BY THE CEA, YOU MUST PAY THE PREMIUM FOR THE CEA EARTHQUAKE INSURANCE POLICY AND THE SURCHARGE.

(c) The total amount of indebtedness and policy surcharges
 authorized under this section shall not exceed one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) plus costs of issuance and sale of those revenue bonds or other debt and amounts paid or payable to bond issuers and providers of credit support and letters of credit for, and interest on, those revenue bonds or other debt, regardless of the frequency or severity of earthquake losses incurred after the creation of the authority. Once the authority has levied policy surcharges in a total amount
 of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) plus costs of issuance and sale of those revenue bonds or securing other debt financing and amounts paid or payable to bond issuers and providers of credit support and letters of credit for, and interest on, those revenue bonds or other debt financing, the authority’s power to surcharge authority policies shall cease and the authority shall be prohibited from levying
 additional surcharges pursuant to this section.

(d) Consistent with Section 676, the authority shall cancel the policy of basic residential earthquake insurance if the policyholder fails to pay the earthquake policy surcharge authorized by the authority, and the insurer shall cancel the policy of residential property insurance if the policyholder fails to pay the policy surcharge authorized by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 828, Sec. 3.   (AB 2927)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.30.

If claims and claim expenses paid by the authority due to earthquake events exhaust the total of (a) the authority’s available capital, (b) the maximum amount of all insurer capital contributions and assessments pursuant to Sections 10089.15 and 10089.23, (c) all reinsurance actually available and under contract to the authority, (d) the maximum amount of all authority policyholder assessments pursuant to Section 10089.29, and (e) all capital committed and actually available from the private capital markets, the board, subject to the approval of the commissioner, shall have the power to assess participating insurance companies subject to the maximum limits in this section. Each participating insurer’s assessment shall be determined by multiplying the percentage share of the authority’s total gross written premium attributable to that participating insurer’s sales of authority insurance policies, as of April 30 of the immediately preceding year or the most recent year for which premium data not more than one year old are available, by the amount of the total assessment sought by the authority. The total amount of all assessments levied against participating insurance companies by the authority pursuant to this section shall not exceed two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000), regardless of the frequency or severity of earthquake losses at any and all times subsequent to the creation of the authority. Once a participating insurer has paid, pursuant to this section, amounts equal to its percentage share of the authority’s total gross written premium, multiplied by two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) reduced from the maximum assessment as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10089.23, the authority’s power to assess that insurer under this section shall cease and the authority shall be prohibited from levying additional assessments on that insurer pursuant to this section. The assessment shall be limited to the amount necessary to pay the expected claims and claim expenses of the authority and return the authority’s available capital to three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), as determined by the board, subject to approval by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 303, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by second Sec. 8 of Ch. 303.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.31.
